Maryland, session 2025, SB0626.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *sb0626*

SENATE BILL 626
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
2–324.
(a) This section applies only in Frederick County.
(b) (1) The SALARY FOR THE Sheriff of Frederick County [shall receive an
annual salary of [$125,000] IS EQUAL TO THE SALARY OF A DEPARTMENT OF STATE
POLICE LIEUTENANT COLONEL, AT THE HIGHEST AVAILABLE STEP FOR A
LIEUTENANT COLONEL UNDER THE DEPARTMENT OF STATE POLICE PAY PLAN IN
EFFECT ON THE DAY PRIOR TO THE DAY THAT THE SHERIFF BEGINS A TERM OF
OFFICE:
(I) $187,313 FOR CALENDAR YEAR 2025; AND
(II) 82.5% OF THE STATE’S ATTORNEY FOR FREDERICK
COUNTY’S ANNUAL SALARY INCLUDING ANY INCREMENTS AND SALARY
ADJUSTMENTS AUTHORIZED UNDER § 15–411(B)(2) OF THE CRIMINAL PROCEDURE
ARTICLE FOR CALENDAR YEAR 2026 AND EACH SUBSEQUENT CALENDAR YEAR.
(2) ANY CHANGE IN THE SALARY PAID UNDER THE DEPARTMENT OF
STATE POLICE PAY PLAN TO THE STATE’S ATTORNEY FOR FREDERICK COUNTY
DURING THE TERM OF OFFICE OF THE SHERIFF MAY NOT APPLY TO THE INCUMBENT
SHERIFF DURING THE SHERIFF’S CURRENT TERM OF OFFICE, BUT THE CHANGED
RATE SHALL TAKE EFFECT AT THE BEGINNING OF THE NEXT FOLLOWING TERM OF
OFFICE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, in accordance with Article
III, § 35 of the Maryland Constitution, this Act may not be construed to extend or apply to
the salary or compensation of the Sheriff of Frederick County while serving in a term of
office beginning before the effective date of this Act, but the provisions of this Act
concerning the salary or compensation of the Sheriff of Frederick County shall take effect
at the beginning of the next following term of office. This limitation does not apply to an
individual appointed or elected after the effective date of this Act to fill out an unexpired
term.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.